Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3020.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5936XC (1) 91 ak/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 144B.6, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. In exercising the authority under the durable power of 3 attorney for health care, the attorney in fact has a duty to 4 act in accordance with shall give preference to the desires of 5 the principal as expressed in the durable power of attorney for 6 health care , a declaration executed by the principal pursuant 7 to section 144A.3, or otherwise made known to the attorney in 8 fact at any time. A declaration executed by the principal 9 pursuant to the life-sustaining procedures Act, chapter 144A , 10 shall not be interpreted as expressing an intent to prohibit 11 the withdrawal of hydration or nutrition when required to be 12 provided parenterally or through intubation and shall not 13 otherwise restrict the The authority of the attorney in fact 14 shall not be restricted by the desires of the principal as 15 expressed verbally to a person other than the attorney in fact 16 or in any other document unless either the declaration or , in a 17 separate section of the durable power of attorney for health 18 care , the principal expressly provides otherwise states that 19 the durable power of attorney for health care is limited and 20 includes the limitations on the authority of the attorney in 21 fact . If the principalâs desires are unknown, the attorney in 22 fact has a duty to act in the best interests of the principal, 23 taking into account the principalâs overall medical condition 24 and prognosis. 25